Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.76.565

Distinguished professorship trust fund program—Trust fund established.

Funds appropriated by the legislature for the distinguished professorship program shall be deposited in the distinguished professorship trust fund. At the request of the office under RCW 28B.76.575, the treasurer shall release the state matching funds to the designated institution's local endowment fund. No appropriation is required for expenditures from the fund. During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the distinguished professorship trust fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the account.

[ 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 903; (2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 902 expired July 1, 2012); 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 113; 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 915; 2009 c 564 s 1805; 2004 c 275 s 20; 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 99; 1987 c 8 s 3. Formerly RCW 28B.10.868.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 903: "Section 903 of this act takes effect July 1, 2012." [ 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 913.]

Expiration date—2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 902: "Section 902 of this act expires July 1, 2012." [ 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 912.]

Effective dates—2011 2nd sp.s. c 9: See note following RCW 28B.50.837.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 37: See note following RCW 13.06.050.

Effective date—2009 c 564: See note following RCW 2.68.020.

Part headings not law—2004 c 275: See note following RCW 28B.76.090.

Effective dates—Severability—1991 sp.s. c 13: See notes following RCW 18.08.240.